Louisiana, session 2026, HB1172.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of United States Highway 165, from the north corporate
limits to the south corporate limits of Oberlin, Louisiana, shall be known and is hereby
designated as the "Kulyn Brooks Manuel Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby directed
to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this highway designation provided local
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1